Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.270

Quieting title to tax-title property—Limitation on recovery for breach of warranty.

No recovery for breach of warranty shall be had, against the county executing a deed under the provisions of RCW 36.35.260, in excess of the purchase price of the land described in such deed, with interest at the legal rate.

[ 1998 c 106 s 21; 1961 c 15 s 84.64.440. Prior: 1929 c 197 s 2; RRS s 11308-12. Formerly RCW 84.64.440.]